Maryland, session 2026, HB0056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
3.
The State shall be divided by law into legislative districts for the election of members
of the Senate and the House of Delegates. Each legislative district shall contain one (1)
Senator and three (3) Delegates. [Nothing herein shall prohibit the subdivision of any one
or more] EACH of the legislative districts ESTABLISHED for the purpose of electing
members of the House of Delegates [into] SHALL CONSIST OF three (3) single–member
delegate districts [or one (1) single–member delegate district and one (1) multi–member
delegate district].
5.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REDISTRICTING CONVENTION” MEANS THE
LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND APPORTIONMENT
CONVENTION.
(B) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY SHALL ENACT A LAW ESTABLISHING AND GOVERNING A LEGISLATIVE
AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND APPORTIONMENT CONVENTION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 OF THE YEAR IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING
THE DECENNIAL CENSUS, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL BE ELECTED BY
QUALIFIED VOTERS OF THE STATE ON A DATE DETERMINED BY THE STATE BOARD
OF ELECTIONS.
(2) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL CONSIST OF 188
MEMBERS.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, ON
OR BEFORE JULY 1 OF THE YEAR OF THE DECENNIAL CENSUS, THE STATE BOARD
OF ELECTIONS SHALL APPORTION THE NUMBER OF SEATS FOR THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION AMONG THE COUNTIES ACCORDING TO EACH COUNTY’S POPULATION
COUNT IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING DECENNIAL CENSUS.
(II) EACH COUNTY SHALL HAVE AT LEAST THREE SEATS ON THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION.

HOUSE BILL 56 3
(4) EACH MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL BE
ELECTED AT LARGE BY THE QUALIFIED VOTERS IN THE COUNTY THAT THE MEMBER
SEEKS TO REPRESENT.
(D) (1) TO BE A CANDIDATE FOR MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION, AN INDIVIDUAL MUST:
(I) BE A REGISTERED VOTER WHO, FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF ELECTION, HAS BEEN:
1. CONTINUOUSLY REGISTERED IN THE STATE WITH
THE SAME POLITICAL PARTY; OR
2. CONTINUOUSLY NOT REGISTERED WITH A PRINCIPAL
POLITICAL PARTY;
(II) BE AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD AT THE TIME OF ELECTION;
(III) HAVE RESIDED IN THE STATE FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF THE MEMBER’S ELECTION; AND
(IV) HAVE RESIDED AND MAINTAINED A PLACE OF RESIDENCE
IN THE COUNTY THAT THE INDIVIDUAL SEEKS TO REPRESENT FOR AT LEAST 6
MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF THE ELECTION.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL IS NOT QUALIFIED TO BE A CANDIDATE FOR
MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS:
(I) THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM THE
STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
(III) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A CANDIDATE
FOR THAT OFFICE;
(IV) AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR A
CANDIDATE FOR AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICE;
(V) AN OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE OF A POLITICAL PARTY OR
POLITICAL COMMITTEE;

HOUSE BILL 56
(VI) 1. A CONTRACTOR PROVIDING PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES TO:
A. THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
B. A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A
CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
C. A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM
THE STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
2. A CURRENT OR FORMER EMPLOYEE OF OR A
CONSULTANT TO AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM;
(VII) AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I), (II), (III), (IV), OR (V) OF THIS PARAGRAPH;
(VIII) A STAFF MEMBER OF:
1. THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
2. A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A
CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
3. A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM
THE STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
4. AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR A
CANDIDATE FOR AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICE; OR
(IX) A CURRENT OR FORMER REGISTERED LOBBYIST.
(3) A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION MAY NOT BE
ELECTED OR APPOINTED AS A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS OR MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY DURING THE FIRST TERM OF OFFICE FOR WHICH THE
CONGRESSIONAL OR LEGISLATIVE PLAN CERTIFIED BY THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION TAKES EFFECT.
(E) (1) [Following each] ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE decennial census of the United States [and after public
hearings, the Governor shall prepare a plan], THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL
ADOPT PLANS setting forth the boundaries of the legislative districts for electing [of] the

HOUSE BILL 56 5
members of the Senate and the House of Delegates AND THE CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS FOR ELECTING REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS.
[The Governor shall present the plan to the President of the Senate and Speaker of
the House of Delegates who shall introduce the Governor’s plan as a joint resolution to the
General Assembly, not later than the first day of its regular session in the second year
following every census, and the Governor may call a special session for the presentation of
the plan prior to the regular session. The plan shall conform to Sections 2, 3 and 4 of this
Article. Following each decennial census the General Assembly may by joint resolution
adopt a plan setting forth the boundaries of the legislative districts for the election of
members of the Senate and the House of Delegates, which plan shall conform to Sections
2, 3 and 4 of this Article. If a plan has been adopted by the General Assembly by the 45th
day after the opening of the regular session of the General Assembly in the second year
following every census, the plan adopted by the General Assembly shall become law. If no
plan has been adopted by the General Assembly for these purposes by the 45th day after
the opening of the regular session of the General Assembly in the second year following
every census, the Governor’s plan presented to the General Assembly shall become law.]
(2) ON ADOPTION OF A PLAN, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION
SHALL:
(I) CERTIFY THAT THE PLAN IS THE PLAN ADOPTED BY THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION; AND
(II) SEND THE CERTIFIED PLAN TO THE PRESIDING OFFICERS
OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(3) (I) ON RECEIPT OF A CERTIFIED PLAN SENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PRESIDING OFFICERS SHALL PREPARE
THE PLAN FOR CONSIDERATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(II) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF EACH
OF THE TWO HOUSES, MAY CHALLENGE THE LEGALITY OF THE CERTIFIED PLAN.
(III) IF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY VOTES TO CHALLENGE THE
CERTIFIED PLAN, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL:
1. CONSIDER THE CHALLENGE; AND
2. WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
VOTE, ISSUE A DECISION THAT AFFIRMS THE PLAN AS MEETING ALL
CONSTITUTIONAL AND STATUTORY REQUIREMENTS OR REJECTS THE PLAN AS
FAILING TO MEET CONSTITUTIONAL AND STATUTORY REQUIREMENTS.

HOUSE BILL 56
(IV) IF THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND REJECTS THE
PLAN, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL ADOPT AND CERTIFY A NEW PLAN
THAT ADDRESSES THE RULING OF THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND.
(4) A PLAN CONSIDERED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL BE
TREATED IN THE SAME MANNER AS A BILL FOR PURPOSES OF PUBLICATION,
CODIFICATION, NOTIFICATION, AND DISTRIBUTION.
(5) A PLAN CERTIFIED BY THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL
BECOME LAW:
(I) ON THE 31ST DAY AFTER CERTIFICATION IF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY DOES NOT CHALLENGE THE PLAN; OR
(II) ON THE DAY THAT THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND
ISSUES A DECISION AFFIRMING THE PLAN IF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
CHALLENGED THE PLAN.
(F) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL PETITION THE SUPREME
COURT OF MARYLAND TO ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS ACCORDING TO THE STANDARDS SET FORTH IN SECTIONS 3 AND 4 OF
THIS ARTICLE OF THIS CONSTITUTION IF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION FAILS
TO ADOPT AND CERTIFY A PLAN UNDER THIS SECTION.
(G) Upon petition of any registered voter, the Supreme Court of Maryland shall
have original jurisdiction to review the legislative districting OR CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTING of the State and may grant appropriate relief, if it finds that the districting
of the State is not consistent with requirements of either the Constitution of the United
States of America, or the Constitution of Maryland.
Article IV – Judiciary Department
14.
The Supreme Court of Maryland shall be composed of seven justices, one from the
First Appellate Judicial Circuit consisting of Caroline, Cecil, Dorchester, Kent, Queen
Anne’s, Somerset, Talbot, Wicomico, and Worcester Counties; one from the Second
Appellate Judicial Circuit consisting of Baltimore and Harford Counties; one from the Third
Appellate Judicial Circuit, consisting of Allegany, Carroll, Frederick, Garrett, Howard, and
Washington Counties; one from the Fourth Appellate Judicial Circuit, consisting of Prince
George’s County; one from the Fifth Appellate Judicial Circuit, consisting of Anne Arundel,
Calvert, Charles, and St. Mary’s Counties; one from the Sixth Appellate Judicial Circuit,
consisting of Baltimore City; and one from the Seventh Appellate Judicial Circuit,
consisting of Montgomery County. The Justices of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall be
residents of their respective Appellate Judicial Circuits. The term of each Justice of the

HOUSE BILL 56 7
Supreme Court of Maryland shall begin on the date of the Justice’s qualification. One of
the Justices of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall be designated by the Governor as the
Chief Justice. The jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall be co–extensive with
the limits of the State and such as now is or may hereafter be prescribed by law.
EXCLUSIVE AMONG THE STATE COURTS, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND
SHALL HAVE ORIGINAL JURISDICTION: (1) TO ESTABLISH THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN AND THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN IN THE EVENT THAT A
PLAN IS NOT ENACTED UNDER SECTION 5 OF ARTICLE III OF THIS CONSTITUTION;
AND (2) TO CONSIDER A PETITION SEEKING REVIEW OF THE LEGALITY OF A PLAN TO
ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE OR CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS ENACTED UNDER
SECTION 5 OF ARTICLE III OF THIS CONSTITUTION. It shall hold its sessions in the
City of Annapolis at such time or times as it shall from time to time by rule prescribe. Its
session or sessions shall continue not less than ten months in each year, if the business
before it shall so require, and it shall be competent for the justices temporarily to transfer
their sittings elsewhere upon sufficient cause. The salary of each Justice of the Supreme
Court of Maryland shall be that now or hereafter prescribed by the General Assembly and
shall not be diminished during the Justice’s continuance in office. Five of the justices shall
constitute a quorum, and five justices shall sit in each case unless the Supreme Court of
Maryland shall direct that an additional justice or justices sit for any case. The concurrence
of a majority of those sitting shall be sufficient for the decision of any cause, and an equal
division of those sitting in a case has the effect of affirming the decision appealed from if
there is no application for reargument as hereinafter provided. In any case where there is
an equal division or a three to two division of the Supreme Court of Maryland a reargument
before the full Court of seven justices shall be granted to the losing party upon application
as a matter of right.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Election Law
SUBTITLE 7A. LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND
APPORTIONMENT CONVENTION.
8–7A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PLAN” MEANS THE PROPOSED LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
PROPOSED CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN ADOPTED BY THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION.
(C) “REDISTRICTING CONVENTION” MEANS THE LEGISLATIVE AND
CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND APPORTIONMENT CONVENTION.

HOUSE BILL 56
8–7A–02.
IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT:
(1) NEITHER THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS NOR THE CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS BE ESTABLISHED FOR THE PURPOSE OF FAVORING OR DISCRIMINATING
AGAINST AN INCUMBENT OFFICEHOLDER, A CANDIDATE FOR OFFICE, OR A
POLITICAL PARTY; AND
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE COMPLY WITH AND
IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE III, §§ 2, 3, 4, AND 5 AND ARTICLE IV, §
14 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
8–7A–03.
THERE IS A LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND
APPORTIONMENT CONVENTION.
8–7A–04.
(A) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2031, AND MARCH 1 EACH YEAR ENDING IN
THE NUMERAL 1 THEREAFTER, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL BE
ELECTED BY QUALIFIED VOTERS OF THE STATE ON A DATE DETERMINED BY THE
STATE BOARD.
(B) THE ELECTION OF MEMBERS OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION IS
DESIGNED TO PRODUCE A REDISTRICTING CONVENTION THAT IS:
(1) INDEPENDENT FROM LEGISLATIVE INFLUENCE; AND
(2) REASONABLY REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE’S GEOGRAPHICAL
MAKEUP.
8–7A–05.
(A) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION CONSISTS OF 188 MEMBERS.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE JULY 1, 2030, AND JULY 1 EACH YEAR ENDING IN THE NUMERAL 0
THEREAFTER, THE STATE BOARD SHALL APPORTION THE NUMBER OF SEATS FOR
THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION AMONG THE COUNTIES ACCORDING TO EACH
COUNTY’S POPULATION COUNT IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING DECENNIAL

HOUSE BILL 56 9
CENSUS.
(2) EACH COUNTY SHALL HAVE AT LEAST THREE SEATS ON THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION.
(C) EACH MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL BE
ELECTED AT LARGE BY THE QUALIFIED VOTERS IN THE COUNTY THAT THE MEMBER
SEEKS TO REPRESENT.
(D) THE MEMBERS OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL CONSIST
OF THE CANDIDATES WHO RECEIVE THE HIGHEST NUMBER OF VOTES CAST WITHIN
EACH COUNTY.
(E) (1) TO BE A CANDIDATE FOR MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION, AN INDIVIDUAL MUST:
(I) BE A REGISTERED VOTER WHO, FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF ELECTION, HAS BEEN:
1. CONTINUOUSLY REGISTERED IN THE STATE WITH
THE SAME POLITICAL PARTY; OR
2. CONTINUOUSLY NOT REGISTERED WITH A PRINCIPAL
POLITICAL PARTY;
(II) BE AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD AT THE TIME OF ELECTION;
(III) HAVE RESIDED IN THE STATE FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF THE ELECTION; AND
(IV) HAVE RESIDED AND MAINTAINED A PLACE OF RESIDENCE IN
THE COUNTY THAT THE INDIVIDUAL SEEKS TO REPRESENT FOR AT LEAST 6 MONTHS
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF THE ELECTION.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL IS NOT QUALIFIED TO BE A CANDIDATE FOR
MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS:
(I) THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM THE
STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
(III) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A CANDIDATE

HOUSE BILL 56
FOR THAT OFFICE;
(IV) AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR A
CANDIDATE FOR AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICE;
(V) AN OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE OF A POLITICAL PARTY OR
POLITICAL COMMITTEE;
(VI) 1. A CONTRACTOR PROVIDING PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES TO:
A. THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
B. A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A
CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
C. A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM
THE STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
2. A CURRENT OR FORMER EMPLOYEE OF OR A
CONSULTANT TO AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM;
(VII) AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I), (II), (III), (IV), OR (V) OF THIS PARAGRAPH;
(VIII) A STAFF MEMBER OF:
1. THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
2. A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A
CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
3. A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM
THE STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
4. AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR A
CANDIDATE FOR AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICE; OR
(IX) A CURRENT OR FORMER REGISTERED LOBBYIST.
(3) A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION MAY NOT BE
ELECTED OR APPOINTED AS A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS OR MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY DURING THE FIRST TERM OF OFFICE FOR WHICH THE

HOUSE BILL 56 11
CONGRESSIONAL OR LEGISLATIVE PLAN CERTIFIED BY THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION TAKES EFFECT.
(F) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION
CONTINUES UNTIL LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL PLANS BECOME LAW.
(2) A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION IS ELIGIBLE
FOR REELECTION.
(G) EACH MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL APPLY
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE IN A MANNER THAT IS IMPARTIAL AND THAT
REINFORCES PUBLIC CONFIDENCE IN THE INTEGRITY OF THE REDISTRICTING
PROCESS.
(H) A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
8–7A–06.
(A) THE 188 MEMBERS ELECTED UNDER § 8–7A–05(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL SERVE AS THE MEMBERS OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION BEGINNING
ON THE DATE THEY ARE ELECTED UNTIL THE DATE ON WHICH THE LEGISLATIVE AND
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTING PLANS BECOME LAW.
(B) IF THERE IS A VACANCY IN THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION, THE LOSING CANDIDATE FROM THE SAME COUNTY WHO RECEIVED
THE NEXT HIGHEST NUMBER OF VOTES SHALL FILL THE VACANCY FOR THE
REMAINDER OF THE TERM.
(C) (1) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION MAY REMOVE A MEMBER:
(I) FOR NEGLECT OF DUTY;
(II) FOR MISCONDUCT IN OFFICE;
(III) FOR A DISABILITY THAT MAKES THE MEMBER UNABLE TO
DISCHARGE THE POWERS AND DUTIES OF OFFICE;

HOUSE BILL 56
(IV) FOR FAILING TO MAINTAIN THE QUALIFICATIONS UNDER §
8–7A–05 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(V) IF THE MEMBER IS CONVICTED OF OR PLEADS GUILTY OR
NOLO CONTENDERE WITH RESPECT TO A FELONY OR CRIME INVOLVING MORAL
TURPITUDE, WHETHER OR NOT ANY APPEAL OR OTHER PROCEEDING IS PENDING TO
HAVE THE CONVICTION OR PLEA SET ASIDE.
(2) BEFORE REMOVING A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL GIVE THE MEMBER:
(I) WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE CHARGES; AND
(II) AN OPPORTUNITY TO ANSWER THE CHARGES.
(3) A MAJORITY VOTE OF THE MEMBERS OF THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION SHALL BE REQUIRED TO REMOVE A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
8–7A–07.
(A) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS ELECTED TO THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION IS A QUORUM.
(B) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL
ELECT A CHAIR AND VICE CHAIR.
(C) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE DEPARTMENT OF
LEGISLATIVE SERVICES JOINTLY SHALL STAFF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION.
8–7A–08.
(A) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL:
(1) CONDUCT A PROCESS THAT IS OPEN AND TRANSPARENT TO
ENABLE FULL PUBLIC CONSIDERATION OF AND COMMENT ON THE ESTABLISHMENT
OF LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS;
(2) ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS ACCORDING TO THE REDISTRICTING STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER
ARTICLE III, §§ 3 AND 4 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION AND FEDERAL AND
STATE LAW; AND

HOUSE BILL 56 13
(3) CONDUCT BUSINESS WITH INTEGRITY AND FAIRNESS.
(B) (1) THE ACTIVITIES OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION ARE
SUBJECT TO THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT AND THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
(2) MEETINGS OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL BE
LIVESTREAMED TO ALLOW MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC TO OBSERVE THE
PROCEEDINGS OF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION.
(C) (1) THE MEMBERS OF EACH COUNTY DELEGATION TO THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL HOLD AT LEAST ONE HEARING IN THE COUNTY
THAT IS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC FOR PUBLIC INPUT AND DELIBERATION THAT IS:
(I) SUBJECT TO PUBLIC NOTICE; AND
(II) DESIGNED TO ENCOURAGE CITIZEN OUTREACH AND TO
SOLICIT BROAD PUBLIC PARTICIPATION IN THE REDISTRICTING PROCESS.
(2) EACH HEARING HELD UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE SCHEDULED BEFORE THE CONSIDERATION OF ANY PLAN BY
THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION.
8–7A–09.
(A) (1) IN THE YEAR FOLLOWING EACH DECENNIAL CENSUS OF THE
UNITED STATES, OR WHEN OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW, THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION SHALL ADOPT PLANS TO ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS IN CONFORMANCE WITH THE STANDARDS AND
PROCESSES ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION,
AND FEDERAL LAW.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR ENDING IN THE NUMERAL
1, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL APPROVE TWO PLANS:
(I) ONE PLAN SHALL DESCRIBE THE DISTRICT BOUNDARY
LINES FOR THE ELECTION OF MEMBERS OF THE SENATE AND THE HOUSE OF
DELEGATES; AND
(II) ONE PLAN SHALL DESCRIBE THE DISTRICT BOUNDARY
LINES FOR THE STATE’S REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS.
(B) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL ISSUE WITH EACH PLAN:

HOUSE BILL 56
(1) MAPS SHOWING THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS; AND
(2) A REPORT THAT:
(I) EXPLAINS THE BASIS ON WHICH THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION MADE ITS DECISIONS TO ACHIEVE COMPLIANCE WITH THE CRITERIA
SPECIFIED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) INCLUDES DEFINITIONS OF THE TERMS AND STANDARDS
USED IN DRAWING EACH PLAN.
(C) ON ADOPTION OF A PLAN, THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL:
(1) CERTIFY THAT THE PLAN IS THE PLAN ADOPTED BY THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION; AND
(2) SEND THE CERTIFIED PLAN TO THE PRESIDING OFFICERS OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(D) (1) ON RECEIPT OF A CERTIFIED PLAN SENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C)
OF THIS SECTION, THE PRESIDING OFFICERS SHALL PREPARE THE PLAN FOR
CONSIDERATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF EACH OF THE
TWO HOUSES, MAY CHALLENGE LEGALITY OF THE CERTIFIED PLAN.
(3) IF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY VOTES TO CHALLENGE THE
CERTIFIED PLAN, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL:
(I) CONSIDER THE CHALLENGE; AND
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY VOTE,
ISSUE A DECISION THAT AFFIRMS THE PLAN AS MEETING ALL CONSTITUTIONAL AND
STATUTORY REQUIREMENTS OR REJECTS THE PLAN AS FAILING TO MEET
CONSTITUTIONAL AND STATUTORY REQUIREMENTS.
(4) IF THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND REJECTS THE PLAN, THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL CERTIFY A NEW PLAN THAT ADDRESSES THE
RULING OF THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND.
(E) A PLAN CONSIDERED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL BE TREATED
IN THE SAME MANNER AS A BILL FOR PURPOSES OF PUBLICATION, CODIFICATION,

HOUSE BILL 56 15
NOTIFICATION, AND DISTRIBUTION.
(F) A PLAN CERTIFIED BY THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL
BECOME LAW:
(1) ON THE 31ST DAY AFTER CERTIFICATION IF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY DOES NOT CHALLENGE THE PLAN; OR
(2) ON THE DAY THAT THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND ISSUES A
DECISION AFFIRMING THE PLAN IF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY CHALLENGED THE
PLAN.
8–7A–10.
(A) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL PETITION THE SUPREME
COURT OF MARYLAND TO ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS IN CONFORMANCE WITH FEDERAL AND STATE CONSTITUTIONAL AND
STATUTORY STANDARDS IF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION FAILS TO ADOPT AND
CERTIFY A PLAN UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL REPRESENT THE STATE
REGARDING ANY PETITION SEEKING A REVIEW OF A CERTIFIED PLAN.
(C) IN ANY CASE BROUGHT IN A FEDERAL COURT TO REVIEW A PLAN, IF THE
REDISTRICTING CONVENTION IS NOT A PARTY TO THE CASE, THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION SHALL MOVE TO INTERVENE IN THE CASE ON BEHALF OF THE STATE.
8–7A–11.
(A) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL HAVE ORIGINAL
JURISDICTION TO ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS IN CONFORMANCE WITH FEDERAL AND STATE CONSTITUTIONAL AND
STATUTORY STANDARDS IF:
(1) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION FAILS TO APPROVE A PLAN
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) A REGISTERED VOTER FILES A PETITION UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) ON THE ENACTMENT OF A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR A
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN, ANY REGISTERED VOTER IN THE STATE MAY FILE
A PETITION WITH THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND TO BAR THE PLAN FROM

HOUSE BILL 56
TAKING EFFECT ON THE GROUNDS THAT THE PLAN VIOLATES THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION, THE UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION, OR A FEDERAL OR STATE
STATUTE.
(2) THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION SHALL BE THE DEFENDANT IN
A PETITION FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE MARYLAND RULES, ANY REGISTERED VOTER OF THE
STATE MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE PROCEEDING AS AN AMICUS CURIAE.
(D) (1) IF A PETITION IS FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND:
(I) SHALL SET DEADLINES FOR THE FILING OF PLEADINGS AND
AMICUS CURIAE BRIEFS; AND
(II) MAY APPOINT A SPECIAL MASTER TO MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS.
(2) A SPECIAL MASTER APPOINTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) HOLD A HEARING;
(II) CONSIDER A PLAN APPROVED BY THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION, IF ANY; AND
(III) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE SUPREME COURT OF
MARYLAND.
(3) WITHIN THE TIME PERIOD ESTABLISHED BY THE SUPREME
COURT OF MARYLAND UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PARTY MAY
FILE EXCEPTIONS TO THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE SPECIAL MASTER.
(4) BEFORE ORDERING ANY RELIEF, THE SUPREME COURT OF
MARYLAND SHALL:
(I) HOLD A HEARING;
(II) CONSIDER A PLAN APPROVED BY THE REDISTRICTING
CONVENTION, IF ANY; AND
(III) CONSIDER ANY RECOMMENDATIONS OF A SPECIAL MASTER.

HOUSE BILL 56 17
(E) (1) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND MAY ORDER ANY RELIEF
CONSIDERED APPROPRIATE.
(2) IN ORDERING RELIEF:
(I) IF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION ADOPTED AND
CERTIFIED A PLAN, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND MAY APPROVE, MODIFY,
OR ADOPT A NEW PLAN; OR
(II) IF THE REDISTRICTING CONVENTION HAS NOT ADOPTED
AND CERTIFIED A PLAN, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL ESTABLISH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS ACCORDING TO THE
STANDARDS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBTITLE AND ARTICLE III, §§ 3 AND 4 OF THE
MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(F) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL GIVE PRIORITY TO RULING
ON A PETITION FILED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions of
Section 5 of this Act, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the
Governor that the constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast
at the general election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.